lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo kajakas: Žvejybinė; Pripučiama / sulankstoma valtis („packraft“); Pramoginė; Jūrinė / turistinė; Užsėdama; Dvivietė (tandemas); Kita
vi: Loại thuyền Kayak tương thích: Câu cá; Bơm hơi/Packraft; Giải trí; Đi biển/Du ngoạn; Ngồi trên (Sit-on-top); Đôi (Tandem); Khác
th: ประเภทเรือคายัคที่เข้ากันได้: ตกปลา; เป่าลม/แพยาง; สันทนาการ; ทะเล/ทัวร์ริ่ง; Sit-on-top; เรือคู่; อื่นๆ
nb: Kompatibel kayaktype: Fiske; Oppblåsbar/packraft; Fritid; Hav/touring; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Annet
ja: 対応カヤックタイプ: フィッシング; インフレータブル/パックラフト; レクリエーショナル; シー/ツーリング; シットオントップ; タンデム; その他
ro-RO: Tip de caiac compatibil: Pescuit; Gonflabil / Packraft; De agrement; Mare / Touring; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Altele
zh-CN: 适用皮划艇类型: 钓鱼; 充气/折叠皮艇; 休闲; 巡航/海洋; 平台式; 双人; 其他
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta kajaka: Ribiški; Napihljiv/packraft; Rekreativni; Morski/potovalni; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Drugo
en: Compatible kayak type: Fishing; Inflatable/Packraft; Recreational; Sea/Touring; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Other
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta kajaka: Za ribolov; Na napuhavanje / packraft; Rekreativno; Morsko/turističko; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Ostalo
fr: Type de kayak compatible: De pêche; Gonflable/Packraft; De loisir; De mer/randonnée; Sit-on-top; Biplace; Autre
el: Συμβατός τύπος καγιάκ: Ψάρεμα; Φουσκωτό/Packraft; Αναψυχής; Θαλάσσης/Touring; Sit-on-top; Διπλό; Άλλο
ru: Совместимый тип каяка: Рыболовные; Надувные / пакрафты; Рекреационные; Морские / туристические; Сит-он-топ (с открытой декой); Тандем; Другое
de: Kompatibler Kayaktyp: Angeln; Schlauchboot/Packraft; Freizeit; See/Touring; Sit-on-Top; Tandem; Sonstige
tr: Uyumlu kano tipi: Balıkçılık; Şişme/Packraft; Hobi/Gezi; Deniz/Tur; Üstten oturmalı; Tandem (çift kişilik); Diğer
sv: Kompatibel kajaktyp: Fiske; Uppblåsbar/packraft; Fritid; Hav/touring; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Övrigt
zh-TW: 相容皮艇類型: 釣魚; 充氣/便攜式橡皮艇; 休閒; 海洋/巡航; 平台式 (Sit-on-top); 雙人; 其他
nl: Compatibel type kajak: Vissen; Opblaasbaar/packraft; Recreatief; Zee/touring; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Overig
es: Tipo de kayak compatible: Pesca; Inflable/packraft; Recreativo; Mar/travesía; Sit-on-top; Tándem; Otro
pt-BR: Tipo de caiaque compatível: Pesca; Inflável/Packraft; Recreativo; Oceânico/Travessia; Sit-on-top (aberto); Duplo; Outro
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ kajaku: Rybársky; Nafukovací/packraft; Rekreačný; Morský/turistický; Sit-on-top; Tandemový; Iné
fi: Yhteensopiva kajakkityyppi: Kalastus; Ilmatäytteinen / packraft; Vapaa-aika; Meri / retkeily; Sit-on-top; Kaksikko; Muu
cs: Kompatibilní s typem kajaku: Rybářské; Nafukovací/packraft; Rekreační; Mořské/turistické; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Jiné
hu: Kompatibilis kajaktípus: Horgász; Felfújható/Packraft; Szabadidős; Tengeri/túra; Ráülős (sit-on-top); Tandem; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de caiaque compatível: Pesca; Insuflável/packraft; Recreativo; Mar/turismo; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Outro
bg-BG: Съвместим тип каяк: Риболов; Надуваем/Packraft; За отдих; Морски/туристически; Сядане отгоре (Sit-on-top); Тандем; Друго
pl: Zgodny typ kajaka: Wędkarski; Dmuchany / packraft; Rekreacyjny; Morski / turystyczny; Typu sit-on-top; Tandem; Inne
ko: 호환 카약 유형: 낚시용; 공기 주입식/팩래프트; 레크리에이션용; 바다/투어링용; 시트온탑; 탠덤; 기타
it: Tipo di kayak compatibile: Pesca; Gonfiabile/Packraft; Ricreativo; Mare/Touring; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Altro
da: Kompatibel kayaktype: Fiskeri; Oppustelig/packraft; Fritid; Hav/touring; Sit-on-top; Tandem; Andet